California, session 20252026, AB555.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 43024.4 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:43024.4. Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of, and in accordance with Section 9795 of, the Government Code, the state board shall, on a quarterly basis, submit to the relevant policy committees of the Legislature a report providing data and describing the impacts of its regulations of transportation fuels, including, but not limited to, the Low-Carbon Fuel Standard regulations (Subarticle 7 (commencing with Section 95480) of Article 4 of Subchapter 10 of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations), on the prices of those fuels to California consumers.